Missouri, session 2026, SB1542.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 472.010, 472.100, and 473.020, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 472.010, 472.100, and 473.020, to read as
follows:
472.010. When used in this code, unless otherwise
apparent from the context:
(1) "Administrator" includes any administrator de
bonis non, administrator cum testamento annexo,
administrator ad litem and administrator during absence or
minority;
(2) "Child" includes an adopted child and a child born
out of wedlock, but does not include a grandchild or other
more remote descendants;
(3) "Claims" include liabilities of the decedent which
survive whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise,
funeral expenses, the expense of a tombstone, and costs and
expenses of administration;
(4) "Clerk" means clerk of the probate division of the
circuit court;
(5) "Code" or "probate code" means chapters 472, 473,
474 and 475;

SB 1542 2
(6) "Court" or "probate court" means the probate
division of the circuit court;
(7) "Devise", when used as a noun, means a
testamentary disposition of real or personal property or
both; when used as a verb it means to dispose of real or
personal property or both by will;
(8) "Devisee" includes legatee;
(9) "Distributee" denotes those persons who are
entitled to the real and personal property of a decedent
under his will, under the statutes of intestate succession
or who take as surviving spouse under section 474.160, upon
election to take against the will;
(10) "Domicile" means the place in which a person has
voluntarily fixed his abode, not for a mere special or
temporary purpose, but with a present intention of remaining
there permanently or for an indefinite time;
(11) "Estate" means the real and personal property of
the decedent or ward, as from time to time changed in form
by sale, reinvestment or otherwise, and augmented by any
accretions and additions thereto and substitutions therefor,
and diminished by any decreases and distributions
therefrom. Under the provisions of subsections 4 and 5 of
section 209.625, assets held in an ABLE account established
under sections 209.600 to 209.645 shall not be considered
the property of the designated beneficiary of said account
for purposes of this subdivision when applied in chapter
475, unless the estate is in the charge and custody of a
public administrator;
(12) "Exempt property" means that property of a
decedent's estate which is not subject to be applied to the
payment of claims, charges, legacies or bequests as
described in section 474.250;

SB 1542 3
(13) "Fiduciary" includes executor, administrator,
guardian, conservator, and trustee;
(14) "Heirs" means those persons, including the
surviving spouse, who are entitled under the statutes of
intestate succession to the real and personal property of a
decedent on his death intestate;
(15) "Interested persons" mean heirs, devisees,
spouses, creditors or any others having a property right or
claim against the estate of a decedent being administered
and includes children of a protectee who may have a property
right or claim against or an interest in the estate of a
protectee. The term "interested persons" includes any
person or agency nominated to serve as a fiduciary in any
application for letters, petition for appointment of a
guardian or conservator, or petition for appointment of a
trustee. This meaning may vary at different stages and
different parts of a proceeding and must be determined
according to the particular purpose and matter involved;
(16) "Issue" of a person, when used to refer to
persons who take by intestate succession, includes adopted
children and all lawful lineal descendants, except those who
are the lineal descendants of living lineal descendants of
the intestate;
(17) "Lease" includes an oil and gas lease or other
mineral lease, but does not include month-to-month or year-
to-year tenancies under oral contracts;
(18) "Legacy" means a testamentary disposition of
personal property;
(19) "Legatee" means a person entitled to personal
property under a will;
(20) "Letters" include letters testamentary, letters
of administration and letters of guardianship;

SB 1542 4
(21) "Lien" includes all liens except general
judgment, execution and attachment liens;
(22) "Lineal descendants" include adopted children and
their descendants;
(23) "Mortgage" includes deed of trust, vendor's lien
and chattel mortgage;
(24) "Person" includes natural persons and
corporations;
(25) "Personal property" includes interests in goods,
money, choses in action, evidences of debt, shares of
corporate stock, and chattels real;
(26) "Personal representative" means executor or
administrator. It includes an administrator with the will
annexed, an administrator de bonis non, an administrator
pending contest, an administrator during minority or
absence, and any other type of administrator of the estate
of a decedent whose appointment is permitted. It does not
include an executor de son tort;
100 (27) "Property" includes both real and personal
101 property;
102 (28) "Real property" includes estates and interests in
103 land, corporeal or incorporeal, legal or equitable, other
104 than chattels real;
105 (29) "Registered mail" includes "certified mail" as
106 defined and certified under regulations of the United States
107 Postal Service;
108 (30) "Will" includes codicil; it also includes a
109 testamentary instrument which merely appoints an executor
110 and a testamentary instrument which merely revokes or
111 revives another will.
472.100. 1. No notice to interested persons need be
given except as specifically provided for in this code or as

SB 1542 5
ordered by the court. When no notice is required by this
code, the court may require such notice as it deems
desirable by a general rule or by an order in a particular
case.
2. Except as otherwise specifically provided by law,
all notices required by this code or the court to be served
upon any person shall be served as the court directs, by
rule or otherwise, in such manner and at such time as to
constitute reasonable notice, in any of the following
manners:
(1) By delivering to the person, including a minor or
a disabled or incapacitated person not known to have a
legally appointed guardian or conservator, a copy of the
notice personally or by leaving a copy at his dwelling house
or usual place of abode with some person of his family over
the age of fifteen years, or by delivering a copy to an
agent authorized by appointment or required by law to
receive service of process;
(2) By publishing a copy of the notice in some
newspaper qualified to publish legal notices under chapter
493 and having general circulation within the county in
which the court is held for the time required by law or
court rule or order. If no time is fixed by law or by rule
of court, the notice shall be published once each week for
four consecutive weeks, the last insertion being at least
seven days before the hearing. The personal representative,
or other person at whose instance any notice by publication
is required, may designate the newspaper in which such
notice is to be published; but as to any notice which is
necessary to the jurisdiction of the court, the clerk shall
designate the newspaper unless the personal representative
or other person has made such designation and so informed

SB 1542 6
the clerk in writing before the time for commencement of
publication. If there is no qualified newspaper published
in the county, the notice shall be published in some
qualified newspaper published in an adjoining county which
has a general circulation within the county in which the
court is held or the notice shall be given by posting copies
thereof in ten public places in the county as the court
directs. If a notice, which is required to be published
once a week for more than one time, is published in a daily
newspaper, each publication after the first shall appear on
the same day of the week on which the first publication was
made;
(3) By registered or certified mail, addressed to the
person to be notified at his address within the United
States, deposited in the United States mail, with all
postage charges prepaid, and, if ordered by the court, with
a return receipt requested;
(4) By ordinary mail, deposited in the United States
mail with all postage charges prepaid at the first class
rate, in a sealed envelope or on a post or postal card,
properly addressed, bearing the name and return address of
the sender and otherwise inscribed in accordance with the
regulations of the United States Postal Service to require a
return thereof to the sender upon nondelivery to the
addressee;
(5) By any combination of the above or as may be
provided by the rules of civil procedure.
3. Service by publication is notice to all heirs and
devisees, whether known or unknown or whether residents or
nonresidents of this state, spouses and to all creditors and
other persons interested in the estate.

SB 1542 7
4. Provisions in this code for notice to interested
persons, other than by publication, do not require such
notice to creditors unless otherwise specifically required
by the code or by the court.
5. Service of notice upon a minor or a disabled or
incapacitated person having a legally appointed guardian or
conservator, if the fact of the guardianship or
conservatorship is known to the person requiring such
service or is disclosed by the court files or records, shall
be made by serving such guardian or conservator in the
manner provided herein for service upon other persons.
Service upon a corporation may be made in the manner
provided by law for the service of summons on corporations
in civil actions.
6. In all cases where service by publication is
required but personal service or service by registered or
certified mail is not ordered, all interested persons whose
names and addresses appear in the court files or records,
including creditors only when ordered by the court, shall be
served by ordinary mail. Failure in any such case to mail
any notice or failure of any interested person to receive
any mailed notice does not invalidate any order of the court
or deprive the court of jurisdiction.
7. Personal service and service by registered or
certified mail may be made by any competent witness, except
that service by mail of any process, order or notice issued
by the court shall be made by the clerk, or, if personal
service is required, by the sheriff. Service by publication
and by ordinary mail, except those required by section
473.587, shall be made by the clerk when requested in
writing by the party requiring same, and when furnished with
the necessary information therefor.

SB 1542 8
8. If an attorney has entered his appearance in
writing for any party in any probate proceeding or matter
100 pending in the court, all notices required to be served on
101 the party in the proceeding or matter may be served on the
102 attorney and such service shall be in lieu of service upon
103 the party for whom the attorney appears. Service on an
104 attorney may be made by ordinary mail or by leaving a copy
105 of any notice or paper at his office with his clerk or with
106 an attorney employed by or associated with the attorney to
107 be served.
108 9. If the public administrator is nominated as
109 fiduciary, or at any stage of the proceeding is being
110 considered by the court to be nominated as fiduciary, the
111 public administrator shall receive a copy of the application
112 or petition from the applicant, petitioner, or the court and
113 any accompanying documents, including exhibits, and shall
114 receive written notice indicating the date and time of the
115 proceeding, and have an opportunity to attend and be heard.
473.020. 1. If no application for letters
testamentary or of administration is filed by a person
entitled to such letters pursuant to section 473.110 within
twenty days after the death of a decedent, then any
interested person may petition the probate division of the
circuit court which would be the proper venue for the
administration of the estate of such decedent for the
issuance of letters testamentary or of administration. For
purposes of this section, in addition to persons provided
for in subdivision (15) of section 472.010, any person who
has attached a claim supported by an affidavit setting forth
the basis upon which such person has a claim against the
decedent shall be an interested person.

SB 1542 9
2. The petition must be filed within one year after
the date of death of the decedent and shall include the
following:
(1) The decedent's name, the address of the decedent's
last residence and the date of death of the decedent;
(2) If a written will of the decedent has been
presented for probate, the names and addresses of the
personal representatives designated in such will; and
(3) The names, addresses and relationships to the
decedent of the decedent's heirs as is known to, or can be
reasonably ascertained by, the petitioner.
3. Within fifteen days from the date of filing, the
petition shall be set for hearing to determine who should be
directed to apply for letters testamentary or of
administration, and not to determine the validity of any
claim. Notice of the hearing shall be served upon all
interested persons, including a nominated fiduciary, in the
manner and within such time as directed by the court. Upon
hearing of the petition, the court shall enter such order or
orders as it deems appropriate, including any of the
following:
(1) An order directing the person found by the court
to be entitled to the issuance of letters testamentary or of
administration to apply for and qualify for such letters
within such time as is allowed by the court, and in default
of such timely application and qualification, upon
application, the court shall issue letters of administration
to some other person found suitable by the court;
(2) An order refusing letters on the estate; or
(3) An order dismissing the petition.
✓